Illinois, session 104th, HB4126.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-20.6 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-20.6)7    Sec. 12-20.6. Abuse of a corpse.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Corpse" means the dead body of a human being.10    "Sexual conduct" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 11Section 11-0.1 of this Code.12    (b) A person commits abuse of a corpse if he or she 13intentionally:14        (1) engages in sexual conduct with a corpse or 15    involving a corpse; or16        (2) removes or carries away a corpse and is not 17    authorized by law to do so; or18        (3) in the process of concealing the death of a 19    person, uses chemicals, fire, burying, submerging in 20    water, or a combination of those acts.21    (c) Sentence.22        (1) A person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of 23    subsection (b) of this Section is guilty of a Class 2   HB4126- 2 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    felony.2        (2) A person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of 3    subsection (b) of this Section is guilty of a Class 4 4    felony.5        (3) A person convicted of violating paragraph (3) of 6    subsection (b) of this Section is guilty of a Class X 7    felony. 8    (d) Paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Section does 9not apply to:10        (1) persons employed by a county medical examiner's 11    office or coroner's office acting within the scope of 12    their employment;13        (2) the acts of a licensed funeral director or 14    embalmer while performing acts authorized by the Funeral 15    Directors and Embalmers Licensing Code;16        (3) cemeteries and cemetery personnel while performing 17    acts pursuant to a bona fide request from the involved 18    cemetery consumer or his or her heirs, or pursuant to an 19    interment or disinterment permit or a court order, or as 20    authorized under Section 14.5 of the Cemetery Protection 21    Act, or any other actions legally authorized for cemetery 22    employees; 23        (4) the acts of emergency medical personnel or 24    physicians performed in good faith and according to the 25    usual and customary standards of medical practice in an 26    attempt to resuscitate a life;  HB4126- 3 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1        (5) physicians licensed to practice medicine in all of 2    its branches or holding a visiting professor, physician, 3    or resident permit under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, 4    performing acts in accordance with usual and customary 5    standards of medical practice, or a currently enrolled 6    student in an accredited medical school in furtherance of 7    his or her education at the accredited medical school; or 8        (6) removing or carrying away a corpse by the 9    employees, independent contractors, or other persons 10    designated by the federally designated organ procurement 11    agency engaged in the organ and tissue procurement 12    process. 13(Source: P.A. 97-1072, eff. 8-24-12.) 14    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 15amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 16    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)17    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 18    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 19hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 20if:21        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 22    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 23    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 24    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or   HB4126- 4 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 2    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 3    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 4    or persons or the community, based on the specific 5    articulable facts of the case;6        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 7    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 8    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 9    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 10    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 11    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 12    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 13    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 14    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 15    of force against another person, residential burglary, 16    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 17    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 18    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 19    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 20    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 21    disability or disfigurement; 22        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 23    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 24    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 25    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 26    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment   HB4126- 5 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    of the threat upon which the charge is based;2        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 3    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 4    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 5    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 6    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 7    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 8    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 9    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 10    or persons or the community, based on the specific 11    articulable facts of the case;12        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 13    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 14    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 15    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 16    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 17    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 18    case;19        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 20    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 21    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 22    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 23    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 24    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 25    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 26    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of   HB4126- 6 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    the case; 2        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 3    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 4    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 5    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 6    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 7    of the case:8            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 9        firearm);10            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge 11        of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 12        designed or used use for silencing the report of a 13        firearm);14            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 15        firearm);16            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 17        firearm by a repeat felony offender);18            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 19        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 20        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 21        or flechette shells);22            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 23        firearms);24            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 25        firearms on the premises of any school);26            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by   HB4126- 7 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1        liquor license);2            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 3        firearm);4            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);5            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);6            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);7            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 8        of a minor);9            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);10            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 11        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 12        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 13        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 14        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 15        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 16            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 17        manslaughter);18            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);19            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);20            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 21        endangerment);22            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 23            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 24        restraint); 25            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 26            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05   HB4126- 8 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 2        discharge of a firearm); 3            (X) Paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 4        12-20.6 (abuse of a corpse by using chemicals, fire, 5        burying, submerging in water, or a combination of 6        those acts); 7        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 8    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 9    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 10    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 11    the specific articulable facts of the case: 12            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 13        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 14        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);15            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 16        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 17        influence while operating a school bus with 18        passengers);19            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 20        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 21        influence causing great bodily harm);22            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 23        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 24        influence after a previous reckless homicide 25        conviction);26            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the   HB4126- 9 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 2        influence leading to death); or3            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 4        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 5        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 6        under the age of 16);7        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 8    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 9    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 10    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 11    persons or the community, based on the specific 12    articulable facts of the case; or 13        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 14    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:15            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 16        through (a)(7) of this Section; or17            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 18    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 19detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 20probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 21a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 22been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 23indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 24probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 25finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 26misdemeanor.  HB4126- 10 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    (c) Timing of petition. 2        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 3    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 4    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 5    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 6    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 7    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 8    previously released shall not be detained.9        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 10    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 11    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 12    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 13    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 14    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 15    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 16    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 17    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 18    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 19    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 20    filing of the petition and the hearing.21    (d) Contents of petition.22        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 23    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 24    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 25    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 26    persons or the community, based on the specific   HB4126- 11 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.2        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 3    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 4    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 5    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 6    filing of the previous petition.7    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 8for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 9proving by clear and convincing evidence that:10        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 11    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 12    subsection (a), and13        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 14    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 15    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 16    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 17    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 18    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 19    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 20    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 21    1986, and22        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 23    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 24    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 25    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 26    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses   HB4126- 12 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 2    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 3    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and4        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 5    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 6    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 7    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 8    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 9    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 10    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 11    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 12    appear in court as required.13    (f) Conduct of the hearings.14        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 15    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 16    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 17    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 18    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 19    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 20    hearing.21        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 22    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.23        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 24    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 25    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 26    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her   HB4126- 13 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 2    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 3    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 4    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 5    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 6    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 7    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 8    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 9    conducted via a 2-way two-way audio-visual communication 10    system, such consultation shall not be recorded and shall 11    be undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 12        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 13    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 14    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 15    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 16    court determines that the physical health and safety of 17    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 18    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 19    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 20    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 21    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 22    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 23    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 24    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 25    Courts every 6 months. 26        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining   HB4126- 14 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 2    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 3    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 4    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 5    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 6    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 7    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 8    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 9    the court shall state on the record the reason for 10    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 11    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 12    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 13    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 14    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 15    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 16    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 17    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 18    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 19    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 20    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 21    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 22    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 23    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 24    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 25    criminal history, if available, and any written or 26    recorded statements and the substance of any oral   HB4126- 15 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    statements made by any person, if in the State's 2    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 3        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 4    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 5    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 6    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 7    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 8    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 9    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 10    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 11    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.12        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 13    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 14    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 15    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 16    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 17    the defendant.18        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 19    release, and detention prior to trial must be 20    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 21    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 22    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 23    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 24dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 25defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 26person or persons or the community, based on the specific   HB4126- 16 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 2limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:3        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 4    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 5    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.6        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 7    including:8            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 9        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 10        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 11        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 12        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 13        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.14            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 15        psychiatric or other similar social history which 16        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 17        nature, or lack of any such history.18        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 19    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 20    nature of the threat.21        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 22    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 23    them.24        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.25        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 26    complaining witness.   HB4126- 17 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 2    access to any weapon or weapons.3        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 4    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 5    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 6    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 7    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 8    federal or State state law.9        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 10    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 11    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 12    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 13    or lack of such behavior.14    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 15detention:16        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 17    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 18    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 19    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 20    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 21    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 22    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;23        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 24    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 25    pending trial;26        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable   HB4126- 18 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 2    communication with others of his or her choice by 3    visitation, mail and telephone; and4        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 5    required for appearances in connection with court 6    proceedings.7    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 8detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 9Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 10offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 11on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 12is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 13the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 14release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 15any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 16the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 17from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 18good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.19    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 20before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 21is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 22of any person or persons or the community, based on the 23specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 24defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 25    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 26entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section   HB4126- 19 -LRB104 14618 RLC 27760 b1denying his or her pretrial release.2    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 3this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 4release.5    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 6shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 7defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 8proceedings.9    (m) Interest of victims. 10        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 11    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 12    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 13    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 14    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 15        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 16    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 17    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 18    defendant remains in custody. 19(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 10-23-24.)